Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4023
Remedies under other law.

The remedies under the
Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act are not exclusive and do not abrogate
any right or remedy under the law of this state other than the act.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 23.